Illinois, session 104th, SB1230.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Capital Development Board Act is amended by 5adding Section 21 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3105/21 new)7    Sec. 21. Report on planned and ongoing projects. On or 8before July 1, 2026, and every year thereafter, the Capital 9Development Board shall submit a report to the General 10Assembly and the Governor concerning all planned and ongoing 11projects constructed by or under the supervision of the Board.